Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Special Liability Rules

33-3-201. Liability of counselor for suicide or attempted suicide of person counseled.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Counseling center” means any nonprofit service operated at least partially with volunteer assistance that provides counseling, assistance or guidance, either in person or by telephone, to persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance; and

“Counselor” means any psychiatrist, psychologist, licensed psychologist with health service provider designation, certified or licensed marital and family therapist, certified or licensed professional counselor, certified or licensed social worker, or other professional trained in the field of psychiatry or psychology or any nonprofessional person acting under the guidance or supervision of the professionals.

A counselor, while acting within the scope of responsibilities assigned by a counseling center, is not liable civilly or criminally for the suicide or attempted suicide of any person consulting the counselor.

Acts 1978, ch. 632, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-1701, 33-1702; §§ 33-17-101, 33-17-102; Acts 1984, ch. 710, § 1; 1990, ch. 760, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 33-10-101, 33-10-102; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

Good samaritan law, § 63-6-218.

Immunity from suit of not-for-profit boards, § 48-58-601.

33-3-202. Director of not-for-profit corporation providing service not liable for torts of recipients.

While acting in good faith, the directors of a not for profit corporation that provides community residential services or supports for persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability shall not be held personally liable for tortious acts committed by the corporation's service recipients.

Subsection (a) does not preclude imposition of personal liability on a director who also acts as a paid officer or employee of the corporation.

Acts 1979, ch. 33, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 33-17-202, 33-10-202; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-203 — 33-3-205.
[Reserved.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-3-203, concerning temporary legal custody of minors, commitment, treatment and discharge, was transferred to § 37-1-175 in 2000.

33-3-206. Duty to predict, warn or take precautions to provide protection — Liability.

IF AND ONLY IF

a service recipient has communicated to a qualified mental health professional or behavior analyst an actual threat of bodily harm against a clearly identified victim, AND

the professional, using the reasonable skill, knowledge, and care ordinarily possessed and exercised by the professional's specialty under similar circumstances, has determined or reasonably should have determined that the service recipient has the apparent ability to commit such an act and is likely to carry out the threat unless prevented from doing so,

THEN

the professional shall take reasonable care to predict, warn of, or take precautions to protect the identified victim from the service recipient's violent behavior.

Acts 1989, ch. 549, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-10-302(a); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 334, § 3; 2002, ch. 730, § 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), §§ 501.7, 501.8.

Law Reviews.

Balancing Public Safety with the Rights of the Mentally Ill: The Benefit of a Behavioral Approach in Reducing Gun Violence in Tennessee, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 671 (2015).

33-3-207. Discharge of duty.

The duty imposed by § 33-3-206 may be discharged by the professional or service provider by:

Informing the clearly identified victim of the threat;

Having the service recipient admitted on a voluntary basis to a hospital;

Taking steps to seek admission of the service recipient to a hospital or treatment resource on an involuntary basis pursuant to chapter 6 of this title; or

Pursuing a course of action consistent with current professional standards that will discharge the duty.

Acts 1989, ch. 549, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-10-302(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-208. Duty of employees who transmit or record patient communications.

IF AND ONLY IF

an employee of a service provider is normally responsible for transmitting or recording communications from a service recipient to a qualified mental health professional or behavior analyst, AND

the employee receives a communication from a service recipient of an actual threat of bodily harm against a clearly identified victim,

THEN

the employee shall communicate the threat to the professional employed by the service provider.

Acts 1989, ch. 549, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-10-303; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 334, § 4; 2002, ch. 730, § 17.

33-3-209. Immunity from liability where duty satisfied.

If a professional or an employee has satisfied the person's duty under § 33-3-206, § 33-3-208, or § 33-3-210, no monetary liability and no cause of action may arise against the professional, an employee, or any service provider in whose service the duty arose for the professional or employee not predicting, warning of, or taking precautions to provide protection from violent behavior by the person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability.

Acts 1989, ch. 549, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-10-302(a), 33-10-303; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2013, ch. 300, § 10.

33-3-210. Reporting to local law enforcement by a qualified mental health professional or behavior analyst of an actual threat of serious bodily harm or death against an identifiable victim.

If a service recipient has communicated to a qualified mental health professional or behavior analyst an actual threat of serious bodily harm or death against a reasonably identifiable victim or victims, the qualified mental health professional or behavior analyst, using the reasonable skill, knowledge, and care ordinarily possessed and exercised by the professional's specialty under similar circumstances, who has determined or reasonably should have determined that the service recipient has the apparent ability to commit such an act and is likely to carry out the threat unless prevented from doing so, shall immediately report the service recipient to local law enforcement, who shall take appropriate action based upon the information reported.

If a mental health professional or behavior analyst is required to report pursuant to subsection (a), the professional or analyst shall report the following information:

Complete name and all aliases of the service recipient;

Name of the mental health professional or behavior analyst and the name of the private or state hospital or treatment resource from which the individual may be receiving services;

Date of birth of the service recipient;

Race and sex of the service recipient; and

Social security number of the service recipient if available.

The information in subdivisions (b)(1)-(3), the confidentiality of which is protected by other statutes or regulations, shall be maintained as confidential and not subject to public inspection pursuant to such statutes or regulations, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceedings pursuant to §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1353 and 39-17-1354.

Acts 2013, ch. 300, § 9; 2018, ch. 799, § 4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b)(4) and (5).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 799, § 7. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Balancing Public Safety with the Rights of the Mentally Ill: The Benefit of a Behavioral Approach in Reducing Gun Violence in Tennessee, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 671 (2015).

33-3-211. [Reserved.]

IF

a person has refused to perform any act that is prohibited by or is not lawful under this title, OR

a person has relinquished authority over a service recipient based on a decision by another to whom this title gives express authority to make the decision,

THEN

no monetary liability and no cause of action may arise against the person or the service provider in whose service the person was acting for the conduct.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-213 — 33-3-216.
[Reserved.]

The department shall by rule prescribe a uniform assessment process by which to determine whether a service recipient lacks capacity to make decisions on issues within the meaning of § 33-3-218.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-218. Decision making capacity of recipient.

IF

a service recipient, due to intellectual disability or mental impairment related to a developmental disability, is unable to make an informed decision about application for admission to a developmental center under § 33-5-301, request discharge under § 33-5-303, or a routine medical, dental, or mental health treatment, OR

a service recipient, due to a diagnosed mental illness or serious emotional disorder, is unable to make an informed decision about application to a hospital or inpatient treatment resource under § 33-6-201, requesting discharge under § 33-6-206, inpatient mental health treatment, release of information, or getting information, AND

the incapacity is shown by the fact that the person is not able to understand the proposed procedure, its risks and benefits, or the available alternative procedures,

THEN

the person “lacks capacity” under this title for decision about that matter at this time.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 18; 2005, ch. 150, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Law Reviews.

To Be or Not To Be in Tennessee: Deciding Surrogate Issues, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 333 (2004).

Attorney General Opinions. There is no conflict between the surrogate decision making provisions of Title 33 and the conservatorship provisions of Title 34 with respect to the standard used to determine whether an individual is able to make his or her life choices, OAG 05-157 (10/14/05), 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 159.

33-3-219. Surrogate decision maker for medical decisions — Immunity from liability.

IF

an adult with developmental disability that is not based solely on a diagnosis of mental illness or serious emotional disturbance does not have a conservator, OR

a child with developmental disability that is not based solely on a diagnosis of mental illness or serious emotional disturbance does not have a parent or legal guardian, AND

a licensed dentist determines that the person lacks capacity to make a decision about a routine dental decision, OR

a licensed psychologist with health service provider designation determines that the person lacks capacity to make a decision about routine mental health treatment, OR

a licensed physician determines that the person lacks capacity to make a decision about routine medical or mental health treatment, AND

the physician, psychologist, or dentist uses the assessment process prescribed by rule under § 33-3-217, AND

the physician, psychologist, or dentist determines that someone is eligible to serve as a surrogate decision maker for the service recipient on the matter in question under § 33-3-220, AND

the service recipient does not reject the proposed surrogate for the decision in any way, AND

the physician, psychologist or dentist provides the surrogate the information necessary to an informed decision,

THEN

the surrogate may decide for the service recipient with respect to the matter in question, AND

the surrogate who acts in good faith, reasonably and without malice in connection with the decision shall be free from all liability, civil or criminal, by reason of the decision.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 19.

33-3-220. Eligibility to serve as surrogate decision maker.

IF

a physician, psychologist, or dentist reasonably determines that an adult:

knows about a service recipient's developmental disability and condition as it relates to the matter in question,

is actively involved in the service recipient's life,

is willing to make a decision for the service recipient on the matter in question,

appears to be reasonably capable of making the decision and likely to make it objectively in the service recipient's interest,

appears to have no conflict of interest with the service recipient, and

is, in order of descending preference for service as a surrogate:

the service recipient's spouse,

the service recipient's adult child,

the service recipient's parent or stepparent,

the service recipient's adult sibling,

any other adult relative of the service recipient, or

any other adult,

THEN

the adult is eligible to serve as a surrogate decision maker for the service recipient on the matter in question under §§ 33-3-219 — 33-3-221.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 20.

33-3-221. Immunity of medical professional acting in accordance with decision of surrogate decision maker.

IF

the physician, psychologist, or dentist knows of no family member, of the same or higher order of preference as the surrogate under § 33-3-220(1)(F), who objects to the surrogate's decision, AND

the proposed treatment is not solely for behavior control of a service recipient,

THEN

the physician, psychologist, or dentist may act on the surrogate's decision as if the service recipient had the capacity to consent and had consented personally, AND

the physician, psychologist, or dentist who acts in accord with and in good faith reliance on the surrogate's decision is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or professional disciplinary action based on a subsequent finding of the invalidity of the surrogate's decision.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 20.